Vermont, session 2025-2026, H605.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1007 is amended to read:
§ 1007. LOCAL SPEED LIMITS
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any requirements of section 1025 of this title,
downtown development districts designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A an
area designated as a Step Two or Step Three downtown center or village center
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 5803 may have posted speed limits of less than 25
miles per hour.
VT LEG #386157 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.605
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386157 v.1